Utah statutes.
13-21-3.5.   Registration and suspension of registration.
(1)  A credit services organization shall file an application for registration
with the division before engaging in any activity regulated by this chapter.
The application shall include:
(a)  the name, complete address, and telephone number of the organization;
(b)  the name of any person who owns or controls more than 5% of the
organization, either directly or through another person or entity;
(c)  the name of any individual who is responsible for the day-to-day
operation of the organization;
(d) (i)  the case title, docket number, the names and addresses of all
parties, and a detailed explanation of any administrative, civil, or criminal
action in which the organization or any person identified in Subsection (1)(b)
or (c) is a party to an administrative, civil, or criminal action that arose
in this state or any other jurisdiction involving the offer to provide or the
provision of services described in Section 13-21-2(3)(a); or
(ii)  a notarized statement of the credit services organization's chief
executive officer or principal that neither the organization nor any person
identified in Subsection (1)(b) or (c) is a party to any administrative,
civil, or criminal action described in Subsection (1)(d)(i);
(e)  a detailed outline of the organization's credit services program to be
offered in this state, including two copies of any contract, form, sales
literature, or other relevant document that will be used by the organization;
and
(f)  a reasonable registration fee to be determined by the division.
(2)  The division may deny, suspend, or revoke a registration under this
chapter if:
(a)  a credit services organization has engaged, or is engaging in a violation
of this chapter; or
(b)  a person described in Subsection (1)(b) or (c) has been found in an
administrative, civil, or criminal action in any jurisdiction to have violated
a law relating to the offer to provide or provision of the types of services
described in Subsection 13-21-2(3)(a).
